Final source/morphy/foma/a1.lexc
!!!ClassOne.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N % +verb% %|% +part  +past% %=த்% %|% Part +PresPart +3P +2P +1P +past% %=த்% %|%  +Pres +Fut +Sg +Pl +Masc +Fem +Rat +Irr +Euph +Sandhi +Neg +Comp +Imp +Inf +RelPart +Con +Causal +Temp +Neu +PartNoun % +verb% %|% erbNoun +gerundPres +presParticiple

LEXICON Root

ClassA1 ;

LEXICON ClassA1

කව 	CA1Vinf;
කස 	CA1Vinf;
ගය 	CA1Vinf;
ගර 	CA1Vinf;
ගස 	CA1Vinf;
තන 	CA1Vinf;
තබ 	CA1Vinf;
තව 	CA1Vinf;
තළ 	CA1Vinf;
දම 	CA1Vinf;
දර 	CA1Vinf;
දව 	CA1Vinf;
නග 	CA1Vinf;
නඟ 	CA1Vinf;
නව 	CA1Vinf;
පත 	CA1Vinf;
පළ 	CA1Vinf;
බල 	CA1Vinf;
බහ 	CA1Vinf;
මක 	CA1Vinf;
මර 	CA1Vinf;
මව 	CA1Vinf;
මස 	CA1Vinf;
යව 	CA1Vinf;
ලබ 	CA1Vinf;
වඩ 	CA1Vinf;
වද 	CA1Vinf;
වර 	CA1Vinf;
වව 	CA1Vinf;
වස 	CA1Vinf;
සද 	CA1Vinf;
නට	CA1Vinf;
සර 	CA1Vinf;
සල 	CA1Vinf;
හද 	CA1Vinf;
ගොඩනග 	CA1Vinf;
වගබල 	CA1Vinf;
අභිබව 	CA1Vinf;
පිරිමස	CA1Vinf;
අස්වස 	CA1Vinf;
කරකව 	CA1Vinf;
පටලව 	CA1Vinf;
කෑගහ 	CA1Vinf;


LEXICON CA1Vinf

% +verb:^ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3pl:^ති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +3sg:^ත්වා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^නවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^නවාලා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^නු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^න්න #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sgf:^න්නීය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1sg:^න්නෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1sg:^න්නෙමිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1pl:^න්නෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1pl:^න්නෙමුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +2sg:^න්නෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +2sg:^න්නෙහිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sg:^න්නේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3pl:^න්නෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^පන් #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^පල්ලා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1sg:^මි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1sg:^මිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +1pl:^මු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +1pl:^මුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +3sg:^යි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2sg:^ව #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3pl:^වති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3sgf:^වන්නීය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1sg:^වන්නෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1pl:^වන්නෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2sg:^වන්නෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2pl :^වන්නෙහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3sg:^වන්නේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3pl:^වන්නෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1sg:^වමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +1pl:^වමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +3sg:^වයි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2sg:^වහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2pl:^වහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^වු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +non% +2sg:^හි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +2sg:^හිවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +imp% +non% +2pl:^හු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +caus% +non% +2pl:^හුවා #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +bless% +non% +3sg:^ාවා #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +mixV:^මින් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +preV:^ා #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න්නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^වන්නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^නලද #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^නුලැබූ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^වමින් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ද්දී #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past:^නලදී #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ුණු #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ූ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +1sg:^ුවෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +1pl:^ුවෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +2sg:^ුවෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +2pl:^ුවෙහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3sgf:^ුවාය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3sg:^ුවේය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +past% +3pl:^ුවෝය #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^ේ #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +1sg:^ෙමි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +1pl:^ෙමු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +2pl:^ෙහි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +2pl:^ෙහු #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^ෙයි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3pl:^ෙති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^වෙයි #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3pl:^වෙති #;
% +verb% +fin% +sim% +passive% +non% +3sg:^වේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ිය #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^ුවොත් #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +past:^ුවේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න්නේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^න #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^නට #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non% +preV:^බලවා #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +caus% +non:^වන්නේ #;
% +verb% +nonf% +sim% +non:^නුයේ #;
